Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201645-927
Fees, charges,
costs, and fines; distribution.

(1) The director
shall collect fees, charges, costs, and fines under the Delayed Deposit Services
Licensing Act and remit them to the State Treasurer. Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the State Treasurer shall credit the fees,
charges, and costs to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund and distribute
the fines in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of
Nebraska.

(2) For fees collected pursuant to section 45-910, the State Treasurer
shall (a) credit one hundred fifty dollars of each renewal fee for a main
office to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund and three hundred
fifty dollars of each renewal fee for a main office to the Financial Literacy
Cash Fund and (b) credit one hundred dollars of each renewal fee for a branch
office to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund and four hundred
dollars of each renewal fee for a branch office to the Financial Literacy
Cash Fund.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 27;

Laws 1995, LB 599, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 53;

Laws 2012, LB269, § 3.